Hawaii statutes.
§701-102 All offenses defined by statute;
applicability to offenses committed after the effective date. (1) No
behavior constitutes an offense unless it is a crime or violation under this
Code or another statute of this State.

(2) The provisions of this Code govern the
construction of and punishment for any offense set forth herein committed after
the effective date, as well as the construction and application of any defense
to a prosecution for such an offense.

(3) The provisions of chapters 701 through 706
of the Code are applicable to offenses defined by other statutes, unless the
Code otherwise provides. [L 1972, c 9, pt of §1]

COMMENTARY ON §701-102

There are no common-law offenses in Hawaii, although Hawaii
has to some extent adopted the common law of England.

The common law of England, as
ascertained by English and American decisions, is declared to be the common law
of the State of Hawaii in all cases, except as otherwise expressly provided by
the Constitution or laws of the United States, or by the laws of the State, or
fixed by Hawaiian judicial precedent, or established by Hawaiian usage; provided,
that no person shall be subject to criminal proceedings except as provided by
the written laws of the United States or of the State.[1]

In Territory v. Rogers,[2] the court noted in passing that
there are no common-law offenses in Hawaii.

Despite these clear rules, it appears wise to enact
specifically that no behavior is penal unless it is made so by this Code or by
another statute. That all offenses should be adequately proscribed by statute
seems at this point of legal development a dictate of fundamental fairness.

Subsection (2) makes it clear that on the effective date this
Code shall become the penal law of this State, and thereafter shall govern both
the definitions (construction) and punishment of all offenses defined in the
Code, and the defenses to those offenses.

Subsection (3) holds that all of the general provisions (chapters
701 to 706) of the Code are applicable to all offenses defined by other
statutes. The purpose is to bring uniformity to the area of non-Code statutory
offenses. One result of this rule will be to make defenses defined by the Code
generally available. The Code's definitions of state of mind requirements will
also be applicable, as will the general principles of construction, time
limitations, and res judicata provisions.

Case Notes

Criminal statutes must be reasonably certain and definite to
give notice of required conduct. 56 H. 481, 541 P.2d 1020 (1975).

No common-law offenses in this jurisdiction, and the
applicable statute or ordinance itself must provide a penalty. 62 H. 656, 619
P.2d 93 (1980).

No offense of "murder for hire". 3 H. App. 107,
643 P.2d 807 (1982).

__________

§701-102 Commentary:

1. H.R.S. §1-1. (Emphasis added.)

2. 37 Haw. 566 (1947).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next